Washington statutes.
RCW 15.80.550

Weighmaster or weigher to determine weights—Automatic devices.

No weighmaster or weigher shall enter a weight value on a certified weight ticket that he or she has not determined and he or she shall not make a weight entry on a weight ticket issued at any other location: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That if the director determines that an automatic weighing or measuring device can accurately and safely issue weights in conformance with the purpose of this chapter, he or she may adopt a regulation to provide for the use of such a device for the issuance of certified weight tickets. The certified weight ticket shall be so prepared that it will show the weight or weights actually determined by the weighmaster. In any case in which only the gross, the tare or the net weight is determined by the weighmaster he or she shall strike through or otherwise cancel the printed entries for the weights not determined or computed by him or her.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6108; 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 26.]